Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 6 Pharmacies

26-4-110.
Pharmacy licenses — Classifications; applications; fees; investigations; prescription department requirements.

All facilities engaged in the manufacture, production, sale, or distribution of drugs or devices utilized in the practice of pharmacy or pharmacies where drugs or devices are dispensed or pharmacy care is provided shall be licensed by the board and shall biennially renew their license with the board. Where operations are conducted at more than one location, each such location shall be licensed by the board.

The board may by rule determine the licensure classifications of all persons and facilities licensed as a pharmacy under this article and establish minimum standards for such persons and facilities.

The board shall establish by rule, under the powers granted to it under Article 2 of this chapter and as may be required from time to time under federal law the criteria which each person must meet to qualify for licensure as a pharmacy in each classification. The board may issue licenses with varying restrictions to such persons where the board deems it necessary.

All applications for a new license shall be accompanied by a fee. Upon the filing of an application for a license, the board may cause a thorough investigation of the applicant to be made, and, if satisfied that the applicant possesses the necessary qualifications and that the pharmacy will be conducted in accordance with law, shall issue a license.

Each pharmacy shall have a pharmacist in charge. Whenever an applicable rule requires or prohibits action by a pharmacy, responsibility shall be that of the owner and the pharmacist in charge of the pharmacy, whether the owner is a sole proprietor, partnership, association, corporation, or otherwise. The pharmacist in charge shall be responsible for notifying the board in accordance with its rules and regulations of updated information regarding the registration of pharmacy technicians.

The board may enter into agreements with other states or with third parties for the purpose of exchanging information concerning licensure of any pharmacy.

The board may deny or refuse to renew a pharmacy license if it determines that the granting or renewing of such license would not be in the public interest.

It shall be unlawful for any person in connection with any place of business or in any manner to take, use, or exhibit the title “drug store,” “pharmacy,” “apothecary,” or any combination of such titles or any title or designation of like import or other term to take the place of such title, unless such place of business is licensed as a pharmacy under the provisions of this chapter, has submitted a written request to the board and received a waiver from this subsection, or meets the provisions of any rule or regulation regarding use of such titles and promulgated by the board.

Every pharmacy licensed under this chapter shall have a prescription department which shall be kept clean and free of all materials not currently in use in the practice of compounding or preparing a medication for dispensing. The space behind the prescription counter shall be kept free of obstruction at all times.

During hours of operation, every pharmacy licensed pursuant to this chapter shall have a prescription department under the personal supervision of a duly licensed pharmacist who shall have personal supervision of not more than one pharmacy at the same time, provided that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any pharmacist from having personal supervision of a pharmacy located in a hospital, nursing home, college of pharmacy, or a pharmacy owned and operated directly by a health maintenance organization. Every pharmacy licensed under this chapter, except those located within and owned and operated by a duly licensed and accredited hospital, nursing home, or college of pharmacy or a pharmacy complying with subsection (j) of this Code section, shall have a prescription department open for business at all times that the business establishment is open to the public, except that during temporary absences of any licensed pharmacist not to exceed three hours daily or more than one and one-half hours at any one time the prescription department shall be closed and no prescription shall be filled or dispensed.

If a pharmacy is located in a general merchandising establishment, or if the owner of the pharmacy so chooses, a portion of the space of the business establishment may be set aside and permanently enclosed or otherwise secured. Only that permanently enclosed or otherwise secured area shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and shall be registered as a pharmacy. In such case, the area to be registered as a pharmacy shall be permanently enclosed with a partition built from the floor to the ceiling or otherwise secured in a manner as provided by the board through rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 26; Ga. L. 1999, p. 757, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 229, § 4/HB 330.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 229, § 5/HB 330, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2007 amendment becomes effective only if funds are specifically appropriated for purposes of this Act and shall become effective when funds so appropriated become available for expenditure. Funds were appropriated at the 2010 session of the General Assembly and thus, the 2007 amendment became effective July 1, 2010.

26-4-111.
Pharmacy licenses — Minimum standards; transferability.

The board shall specify by rule the pharmacy licensure procedures to be followed, including but not limited to specification of forms for use in applying for such licensure and times, places, and applicable fees.

Applicants for licensure to distribute, manufacture, sell, purchase, or produce drugs or devices within this state shall file with the board a verified application containing such information as the board requires of the applicant relative to the qualifications for a license.

Pharmacy licenses issued by the board pursuant to this chapter shall not be transferable or assignable.

The board shall specify by rule minimum standards for responsibility of any person or pharmacy that has employees or personnel engaged in the practice of pharmacy, manufacture, distribution, production, sale, or use of drugs or devices in the conduct of their business. If the licensed person is a pharmacy located in this state, that portion of the facility to which such license applies shall be operated only under the direct supervision of a pharmacist licensed to practice in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-112.
Occurrences requiring immediate notification to board.

The board shall be notified immediately upon the occurrence of any of the following:

Permanent closing of a licensed pharmacy;

Change of ownership, management, or location of a licensed pharmacy;

Change of the pharmacist in charge of a licensed pharmacy. If upon the board being notified of such change a replacement pharmacist in charge is not named in said notification, the license of that pharmacy shall stand suspended pending further findings by the board;

Any theft or loss of drugs or devices of a licensed pharmacy;

Any known conviction of any employee of a licensed pharmacy of any state or federal drug laws;

Disasters, accidents, theft, destruction, or loss of records of a licensed pharmacy required to be maintained by state or federal law;

Occurrence at a licensed pharmacy of a significant adverse drug reaction as defined by rules of the board; or

Any and all other matters and occurrences at a licensed pharmacy as the board may require by rule.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 127, § 7/HB 209.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the second sentence in paragraph (3).

26-4-113.
Wholesale distributors; licensing requirements; suspension or revocation of license; reinstatement.

No person shall operate as a pharmacy until a pharmacy license has been issued to such person by the board.

Except where otherwise permitted by law, it shall be unlawful for any type of manufacturer, wholesale distributor, reverse drug distributor, outsourcing facility, or third-party logistics provider to distribute or deliver drugs or devices to or receive drugs or devices from any person or firm in this state not licensed under this chapter; provided, however, that out-of-state firms that conduct intracompany transfers of drugs or devices to and have the same ownership as a licensed firm in this state shall not be required to be licensed in this state pursuant to this chapter; and provided, further, that out-of-state third-party logistics providers that are licensed by their resident state or by the federal Food and Drug Administration shall not be required to obtain a license pursuant to this chapter. Any person who distributes or delivers drugs or devices to or receives drugs or devices from a person or firm not licensed under this chapter shall be subject to a fine to be imposed by the board for each offense in addition to such other disciplinary action the board may take under this chapter. Each such violation shall also constitute a misdemeanor.

The board may suspend, revoke, deny, or refuse to renew the pharmacy license of, reprimand, issue a letter of concern to, or fine any person licensed under this article on any of the following grounds:

The finding by the board of violations of any federal or state laws relating to the practice of pharmacy, drug samples, wholesale or retail drug or device distribution, or distribution of controlled substances;

Any felony convictions under federal or state laws;

The furnishing of false or fraudulent material in any application made in connection with drug or device manufacturing or distribution;

Suspension or revocation by the federal or state government of any license currently or previously held by the applicant for the manufacture or distribution of any drugs or devices including controlled substances;

Obtaining any remuneration by fraud, misrepresentation, or deception;

Dealing with drugs or devices that are known or should have been known to be stolen drugs or devices;

Purchasing or receiving of a drug or device from a source other than a person or pharmacy licensed under the laws of the state except where otherwise provided;

Wholesale drug distributors, other than pharmacies, dispensing or distributing drugs or devices directly to patients; or

Violations of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any of the rules adopted by the board under this chapter.

Reinstatement of a pharmacy license that has been suspended, revoked, or restricted by the board may be granted in accordance with the rules of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 855, § 5/HB 926.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of the first sentence of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “Except where otherwise permitted by law, it shall be unlawful for a manufacturer, wholesale distributor, or a reverse drug distributor to distribute or deliver drugs or devices to or receive drugs or devices from any person or firm in this state not licensed under this chapter.”

26-4-114.
Special pharmacy permits.

A pharmacy located within and owned and operated by a school or college of pharmacy in this state may apply to the board for a special pharmacy permit which shall entitle the holder thereof to purchase, receive, possess, or dispose of drugs for educational or research purposes. The application shall include the name of a registered pharmacist who shall be responsible for maintaining accurate records regarding the purchase, receipt, possession, and disposal of drugs utilized for educational or research purposes. If the board certifies that the application complies with applicable laws and rules and regulations, the board shall issue the permit.

A holder of a special pharmacy permit under subsection (a) of this Code section shall not engage in the sale or dispensing of drugs.

The board shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the holder of a special pharmacy permit under this Code section and may exempt the holder thereof from requirements otherwise applicable to other pharmacies.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-114.1.
Application to board for nonresident pharmacy permits; requirements.

Any person, pharmacy, or facility located outside this state may apply to the board for a nonresident pharmacy permit which shall entitle the holder thereof to ship, mail, or deliver dispensed drugs, including but not limited to dangerous drugs and controlled substances, into this state. The board shall establish an application and require such information as the board deems reasonably necessary to carry out a background investigation of applicants and to ensure that the purposes of this Code section are met. Such application shall include:

Proof of a valid, unexpired license, permit, or registration to operate a pharmacy in compliance with the laws and rules of each state in which the applicant receives and dispenses prescription drug orders, including but not limited to orders for prescription drugs, dangerous drugs, and controlled substances;

Addresses, names, and titles of all principal corporate officers and the pharmacist in charge of dispensing drugs to residents of this state; and

A statement of whether the applicant is in compliance with all lawful directions and requests for information from the regulatory or licensing agencies of each state in which the applicant is licensed as well as all requests for information made by the board pursuant to this Code section.

The board shall establish by rule an application fee and the biennial renewal fee for a permit under this Code section.

The board may only deny an application for a nonresident pharmacy permit for failure to comply with rules of the board or any requirements of this Code section or for good cause related to substantial evidence of misfeasance or malfeasance by the applicant. Applicants granted a permit under this Code section shall provide pharmacy care in a manner which does not endanger life and protects the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of this state. A pharmacy, facility, or entity licensed under Title 33 shall not be required to hold a nonresident pharmacy permit.

After an effective date established by rule of the board for the enforcement of the nonresident pharmacy permits, it shall be unlawful for any person, pharmacy, or facility that is located outside this state and that does not possess a nonresident pharmacy permit to ship, mail, or deliver prescription drug orders or to advertise its services in this state, or for any person who is a resident of this state to advertise the services of such person, pharmacy, or facility with the knowledge that the advertisement will or is likely to induce residents of this state to use such person, pharmacy, or facility for pharmacy care. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit or prohibit interstate commerce, including but not limited to the practice of pharmacy by mail.

The board shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the holder of a nonresident pharmacy permit under this Code section. Such rules and regulations shall minimally include the following requirements for nonresident pharmacy permit holders:

A permit holder’s pharmacist in charge of dispensing drugs to residents of this state shall be licensed in his or her state of location;

A permit holder shall provide written notification to the board within ten days of any change of a permit holder’s principal corporate officers or pharmacist in charge of dispensing drugs to residents of this state;

A permit holder shall file a change of location application upon any change to the permit holder’s state of registration in addition to proof of the license, permit, or registration from the permit holder’s new state of registration and the United States Drug Enforcement Administration registration for such new location;

A permit holder shall respond within ten calendar days to all communications from the board concerning emergency circumstances arising from errors in the dispensing of any drugs to residents of this state;

A permit holder shall provide written notification to the board of each location at which the permit holder maintains its records for all prescription drug orders dispensed to patients in this state so that the records are readily retrievable from the business records of the permit holder; and

A permit holder shall maintain a toll-free telephone number operational during the permit holder’s regular hours of operation but not less than six days per week for a minimum of 60 hours per week that shall be used to provide and facilitate patient counseling. Such toll-free number shall be capable of receiving inbound calls from patients to the permit holder and shall be disclosed on the label affixed to each container of all dispensed and distributed drugs.

The board may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a permit of a permit holder for failure to comply with rules of the board or with any requirement of this Code section or for conduct which causes serious bodily or psychological injury to a resident of this state, provided that the board has referred the matter involving the conduct to the regulatory or licensing agency in the state in which the permit holder is located and the regulatory or licensing agency fails to initiate an investigation into the matter within 180 days of such referral or fails, in the board’s judgment, to render sufficient resolution.

As a prerequisite to registering or renewing a registration with the board, a nonresident pharmacy conducting sterile or nonsterile compounding for practitioners to use in patient care in the practitioner’s office shall submit a copy of the most recent and current inspection report resulting from an inspection conducted by the regulatory or licensing agency of the jurisdiction in which it is located that indicates compliance with the requirements of this chapter, including compliance with USP-NF standards for pharmacies performing sterile and nonsterile compounding. The inspection report required by this subsection shall not be required if the compounding within the facility is done pursuant to a prescription. Such inspection report shall be deemed current for the purpose of this subsection if the inspection was conducted:

No more than six months prior to the date of submission of an application for registration with the board; or

No more than two years prior to the date of submission of an application for renewal of a registration with the board.

If the nonresident pharmacy conducting sterile or nonsterile compounding has not been inspected by the regulatory or licensing agency of the jurisdiction in which it is located within the timeframes required in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the board may:

Accept an inspection report or other documentation from another entity that is satisfactory to the board; or

Make a request of the appropriate regulatory or licensing agency of the jurisdiction where the pharmacy is located to cause an inspection to be conducted by an agent duly authorized by the board.

A nonresident pharmacy shall be responsible for paying any inspection fee incurred pursuant to this paragraph.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-114.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 127, § 8/HB 209.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2013.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2013, “with” was inserted near the end of the first sentence of paragraph (g)(1).

26-4-115.
Wholesale drug distributors; registration; fees; reports of excessive purchases; penalty for violations; transfers of drugs.

All persons, firms, or corporations, whether located in this state or in any other state, engaged in the business of selling or distributing drugs at wholesale in this state, in the business of supplying drugs to manufacturers, compounders, and processors in this state, or in the business of a reverse drug distributor shall biennially register with the board as a drug wholesaler, distributor, reverse drug distributor, supplier, outsourcing facility, or third-party logistics provider; provided, however, that out-of-state firms that conduct intracompany transfers of drugs to and have the same ownership as a licensed firm in this state shall not be required to register pursuant to this subsection; and provided, further, that out-of-state third-party logistics providers that are licensed by their resident state or by the federal Food and Drug Administration shall not be required to register pursuant to this subsection. The application for registration shall be made on a form to be prescribed and furnished by the board and shall show each place of business of the applicant for registration, together with such other information as may be required by the board. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount established by the board for each place of business registered by the applicant. Such registration shall not be transferable and shall expire on the expiration date established by the executive director. Registration shall be renewed pursuant to the rules and regulations of the board, and a renewal fee prescribed by the board shall be required. If not renewed, the registration shall lapse and become null and void. Registrants shall be subject to such rules and regulations with respect to sanitation or equipment as the board may, from time to time, adopt for the protection of the public health and safety. Such registration may be suspended or revoked or the registrant may be reprimanded, fined, or placed on probation by the board if the registrant fails to comply with any law of this state, the United States, or any other state having to do with the control of pharmacists, pharmacies, wholesale distribution, reverse drug distribution, or outsourcing facility distribution of controlled substances or dangerous drugs as defined in Chapter 13 of Title 16; if the registrant fails to comply with any rule or regulation promulgated by the board; or if any registration or license issued to the registrant under the federal act is suspended or revoked.

Every drug wholesaler, distributor, supplier, or outsourcing facility registered as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 16 or in subsection (a) of this Code section, except reverse drug distributors, shall:

Submit reports, upon request from the Georgia Drugs and Narcotics Agency, to account for all transactions with licensed persons or firms located within this state; such reportable transactions shall include all dangerous drugs and controlled substances as defined in Chapter 13 of Title 16. Such reports shall be submitted to the Georgia Drugs and Narcotics Agency;

Automatically submit reports of any excessive purchases of controlled substances by licensed persons or firms located within this state using the federal Drug Enforcement Administration guidelines to define excessive purchases as set forth under the provisions of 21 C.F.R. Section 1301. Such reports shall be submitted to the Georgia Drugs and Narcotics Agency; and

Comply with the requirements of Section 360eee, et seq., of the federal act, relating to drug supply chain security.

Each manufacturer of a drug subject to Section 360eee, et seq., of the federal act shall maintain at its corporate offices a current list of the authorized wholesale distributors of such drug.

The board shall establish rules and regulations relating to drug supply chain security based on the requirements of Section 360eee, et seq., of the federal act which are not inconsistent with, more stringent than, or in addition to any requirements applicable under Section 353(e) or Section 360eee of the federal act or any regulations issued thereunder and which are not inconsistent with any waiver, exception, or exemption pursuant to Section 360eee, et seq., of the federal act or any restrictions specified in Section 360eee-1 of the federal act.

The board shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate compliance with this Code section. Such rules and regulations shall include a requirement that all wholesale drug distributors required to register pursuant to this Code section shall make adequate provision for the return of outdated drugs, both full and partial containers, for up to six months after the labeled expiration date for prompt full credit or replacement; provided, however, that such rules and regulations may also include a list of drugs exempted from the requirements of such provision that have been determined by the board as essential to health care treatment and having an expiration date of less than one year from the date such drug is manufactured.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to any wholesaler, manufacturer, distributor, or supplier that only ships controlled substances directly to a licensed wholesaler within this state.

Any person, firm, or corporation which violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five years or by a fine not to exceed $25,000.00, or both.

Any practitioner who knowingly transfers any controlled substance or dangerous drug as such terms are defined in Chapter 13 of Title 16 by purchasing from or returning to a person, firm, or corporation which is not registered as required in subsection (a) of this Code section or as required in Chapter 13 of Title 16 shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than three years or by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00, or both.

Transfers of drugs from a licensed hospital pharmacy to an entity that is affiliated with or owned by the hospital shall not be deemed wholesale distributors of drugs.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1706, § 19; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1492, § 3; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-17/HB 132; Ga. L. 2016, p. 855, § 6/HB 926; Ga. L. 2017, p. 417, § 8-1/SB 104.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (a), substituted “the board” for “said board” in the second sentence, and substituted “executive director” for “division director” in the fourth sentence.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, near the end, deleted “or” preceding “supplier”, and added the language beginning with “, outsourcing facility, or” and ending with “pursuant to this subsection”, in the last sentence, substituted “reverse drug distribution, or outsourcing facility distribution” for “or reverse drug distribution” in the middle; substituted “distributor, supplier, or outsourcing facility registered” for “distributor, or supplier registered” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b); deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(1); in paragraph (b)(2), in the first sentence, substituted “excessive purchases” for “ ‘excessive purchases’ ”, and substituted “Section 1301” for “Sec. 1301”, and, in the second sentence, substituted “; and” for a period at the end; added paragraph (b)(3); added the proviso at the end of subsection (c); and substituted “supplier that” for “supplier who” in subsection (d).

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 8, 2017, added subsection (g).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 61 (2017).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (2017).

26-4-115.1.
Requirement that certain wholesale distributors of controlled substances and dangerous drugs provide price and quantity information.

Every wholesale distributor registered as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 16 or subsection (a) of Code Section 26-4-115, except those which are exclusively reverse drug distributors, shall provide to the Department of Community Health such information, with regard to the controlled substances and dangerous drugs which are distributed by that wholesale distributor, as is determined by that department to be necessary or useful in the department’s efficient administration of the state plan for medical assistance, as defined in Code Section 49-4-141, and in the department’s determination of possible violations of Chapter 13 of Title 16, which information shall include but not be limited to price and quantity information.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-115.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 816, § 6.1.

26-4-116.
Emergency service providers; contracts with issuing pharmacy; record keeping; inspections.

Dangerous drugs and controlled substances as defined under Chapter 13 of Title 16 shall only be issued to the medical director of an emergency service provider from pharmacies licensed in this state only in accordance with the provisions of this Code section.

The medical director of an emergency service provider and an issuing pharmacy must have a signed contract or agreement designating such pharmacy as a provider of drugs and consultant services and a copy must be filed with the state board and the Department of Public Health prior to any drugs being issued.

A manual of policies and procedures for the handling, storage, labeling, and record keeping of all drugs must be written, approved, and signed by the medical director of an emergency service provider and the pharmacist in charge of an issuing pharmacy. The manual shall contain procedures for the safe and effective use of drugs from acquisition to final disposition.

A written record of all drugs issued to the medical director of an emergency service provider must be maintained by the issuing pharmacy and emergency service provider. Agents of the Georgia Drugs and Narcotics Agency may review all records to determine the accuracy and proper accountability for the use of all drugs.

To provide for the proper control and accountability of drugs, a written record of all drugs used by such emergency service provider shall be provided to the issuing pharmacy within 72 hours of use.

A pharmacist from a contracting issuing pharmacy shall physically inspect the drugs of such emergency service provider to determine compliance with appropriate policies and procedures for the handling, storage, labeling, and record keeping of all drugs not less than annually and maintain records of such inspection for a period of not less than two years. Such an inspection shall, at a minimum, verify that:

Drugs are properly stored, especially those requiring special storage conditions;

Drugs are properly accounted for by personnel of such emergency service provider;

Proper security measures to prohibit unauthorized access to the drugs are implemented; and

All policies and procedures are followed and enforced.

All outdated, expired, unused, or unusable drugs shall be returned to the issuing pharmacy for proper disposition in a manner acceptable to the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-116

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 26; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2013, p. 736, § 2/SB 216.

The 2013 amendment,

effective May 6, 2013, substituted “pharmacies” for “a pharmacy” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), substituted “an issuing” for “the issuing” near the beginning, and substituted “such pharmacy as a” for “the issuing pharmacy as the” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “The medical director of an emergency service provider may only have one contractual relationship with one pharmacy per county serviced by such emergency service provider.”; substituted “an issuing” for “the issuing” in the first sentence of subsection (c); and substituted “a contracting” for “the contracting” near the beginning of the introductory language of subsection (f).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

26-4-116.1.
Licensed health practitioners authorized to prescribe auto-injectable epinephrine for schools; pharmacists authorized to fill prescriptions.

A physician licensed to practice medicine in this state, an advanced practice registered nurse acting pursuant to the authority of Code Section 43-34-25, and a physician assistant acting pursuant to the authority of subsection (e.1) of Code Section 43-34-103 may prescribe auto-injectable epinephrine in the name of a public or private school for use in accordance with Code Section 20-2-776.2 and in accordance with protocol specified by such physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant.

A physician licensed to practice medicine in this state, an advanced practice registered nurse acting pursuant to the authority of Code Section 43-34-25, and a physician assistant acting pursuant to the authority of subsection (e.1) of Code Section 43-34-103 may prescribe auto-injectable epinephrine in the name of an authorized entity in accordance with Code Section 31-1-14.

A pharmacist may dispense auto-injectable epinephrine pursuant to a prescription issued in accordance with subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-116.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1039, § 2/HB 337; Ga. L. 2015, p. 312, § 1/SB 126; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 26/HB 737.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 7, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “A pharmacist may dispense auto injectable epinephrine pursuant to a prescription issued in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section.”; and added subsection (c).

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “subsection (e.1)” for “subsection (e.l)” in subsection (b).

26-4-116.2.
Authority of licensed health practitioners to prescribe opioid antagonists; immunity from liability.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“First responder” means any person or agency who provides on-site care until the arrival of a duly licensed ambulance service. This shall include, but not be limited to, persons who routinely respond to calls for assistance through an affiliation with law enforcement agencies, fire departments, and rescue agencies.

“Harm reduction organization” means an organization which provides direct assistance and services, such as syringe exchanges, counseling, homeless services, advocacy, drug treatment, and screening, to individuals at risk of experiencing an opioid related overdose.

“Opioid antagonist” means any drug that binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effects of opioids acting on those receptors and that is approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid related overdose.

“Opioid related overdose” means an acute condition, including, but not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, mania, or death, resulting from the consumption or use of an opioid or another substance with which an opioid was combined or that a layperson would reasonably believe to be resulting from the consumption or use of an opioid or another substance with which an opioid was combined for which medical assistance is required.

“Pain management clinic” means a clinic licensed pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 34 of Title 43.

“Practitioner” means a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state.

A practitioner acting in good faith and in compliance with the standard of care applicable to that practitioner may prescribe an opioid antagonist for use in accordance with a protocol specified by such practitioner to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid related overdose or to a pain management clinic, first responder, harm reduction organization, family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person at risk of experiencing an opioid related overdose.

A pharmacist acting in good faith and in compliance with the standard of care applicable to pharmacists may dispense opioid antagonists pursuant to a prescription issued in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section or Code Section 31-1-10.

A person acting in good faith and with reasonable care to another person whom he or she believes to be experiencing an opioid related overdose may administer an opioid antagonist that was prescribed pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section in accordance with the protocol specified by the practitioner or pursuant to Code Section 31-1-10.

The following individuals shall be immune from any civil liability, criminal responsibility, or professional licensing sanctions for the following actions authorized by this Code section:

Any practitioner acting in good faith and in compliance with the standard of care applicable to that practitioner who prescribes an opioid antagonist pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section;

Any practitioner or pharmacist acting in good faith and in compliance with the standard of care applicable to that practitioner or pharmacist who dispenses an opioid antagonist pursuant to a prescription issued in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section;

The state health officer acting in good faith and as provided in Code Section 31-1-10; and

Any person acting in good faith, other than a practitioner, who administers an opioid antagonist pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section.

Every pharmacy in this state shall retain a copy of the standing order issued under Code Section 31-1-10.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-116.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-2/HB 965; Ga. L. 2017, p. 22, § 4/SB 121; Ga. L. 2017, p. 319, § 3-1/HB 249.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective April 24, 2014. See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2017 amendments.

The first 2017 amendment, effective April 18, 2017, added “or Code Section 31-1-10” at the end of subsection (c); added “or pursuant to Code Section 31-1-10” at the end of subsection (d); in subsection (e), substituted “shall be immune” for “are immune” and substituted “civil liability, criminal responsibility,” for “civil or criminal liability”; deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (e)(2); added paragraph (e)(3); redesignated former paragraph (e)(3) as present paragraph (e)(4); and added subsection (f). The second 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, made identical changes.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 3-1(b)/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Code section shall apply to all acts committed on or after April 24, 2014.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 143 (2017).

For article, “MDL and the Allure of Sidestepping Litigation,” see 53 Ga. L. Rev. 1287 (2019).

For comment, “The Opioid Epidemic: Returning to the Basics,” see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 525 (2019).